Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5343.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 16.76.030 and 2023 c 475 s 920 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The northeast Washington wolf-livestock management account is created as a nonappropriated account in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts, any legislative appropriations, private donations, or any other private or public source directed to the northeast Washington wolf-livestock management grant must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for ((the)): (a) The deployment of nonlethal wolf deterrence resources as described in RCW 16.76.020; (b) wolf-livestock management; and (c) grants to the sheriffs' offices of Stevens and Ferry counties for providing a local wildlife specialist to aid the department of fish and wildlife in the management of wolves. Only the director may authorize expenditures from the account in consultation with the advisory board created in RCW 16.76.020. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures. Interest earned by deposits in the account must be retained in the account.(2) The advisory board created in RCW 16.76.020 may solicit and receive gifts and grants from public and private sources for the purposes of RCW 16.76.020.(((3) During the 2021-2023 and 2023-2025 fiscal biennia, expenditures from the account may be used for wolf-livestock management as well as for grants to the sheriffs' offices of Stevens and Ferry counties for providing a local wildlife specialist to aid the department of fish and wildlife in the management of wolves.))NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. This act expires July 1, 2031.--- END ---